Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.130

Program to help students meet minimum entrance requirements at baccalaureate-granting institutions or to pursue career or other opportunities—High school course offerings for postsecondary credit.

(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school district, for students whose educational plans include application for entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.

(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a skills [skill] center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district, for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. These programs may:

(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills, knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and employability and leadership skills; and

(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.

(3) Within existing resources, all public high schools in the state shall:

(a) Work towards the goal of offering a sufficient number of high school courses that give students the opportunity to earn the equivalent of a year's worth of postsecondary credit towards a certificate, apprenticeship program, technical degree, or associate or baccalaureate degree. These high school courses are those advanced courses that have accompanying proficiency exams or demonstrated competencies that are used to demonstrate postsecondary knowledge and skills; and

(b) Inform students and their families, emphasizing communication to underrepresented groups, about the program offerings and the opportunities to take courses that qualify for postsecondary credit through demonstrated competencies or if the student earns the qualifying score on the proficiency exam. This information shall encourage students to use the twelfth grade as the launch year for an advance start on their career and postsecondary education.

(4) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical program in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics directly to students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that provides a hands-on experience in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical education, and includes a career and technical education exploratory component shall also qualify for the career and technical education funding.

[ 2011 c 77 s 2; 2009 c 212 s 2; 2007 c 396 s 14; (2007 c 396 s 13 expired September 1, 2009); 2006 c 263 s 407; 2003 c 49 s 2; 1991 c 116 s 9; 1988 c 172 s 2; 1984 c 278 s 16. Formerly RCW 28A.05.070.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 77: "The legislature finds that approximately thirty-five percent of seniors in Washington high schools take less than a full load of classes during their senior year. The legislature further finds that many high schools provide students opportunities to take advanced courses in career and technical or academic fields that give students a head start when they begin their career or enter a technical training program or a college or university. The legislature also finds that since each individual institution of higher education adopts its own rules for awarding credit for advanced high school work, students can encounter unanticipated barriers to advancing their dreams. Students can also be discouraged from putting in that extra effort in high school if they are not certain whether their extra work will be appropriately credited toward a certificate or degree.

The legislature intends to help students progress from high school to a certificate or degree by increasing opportunities and providing a clear pathway. Twelfth grade will truly be the launch year as high schools increase the opportunities for students to take more advanced classes. In addition, this act provides for community and technical colleges and four-year institutions of higher education to publish a list of high school courses and adopt uniform scores for proficiency exams or competency requirements that will be given credit toward certificate or degree requirements." [ 2011 c 77 s 1.]

Short title—2011 c 77: "This act may be known and cited as the launch year act." [ 2011 c 77 s 5.]

Effective date—2009 c 212 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect September 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 212 s 3.]

Finding—2009 c 212: "The legislature finds that significant efforts are under way to improve mathematics and science instruction in Washington's public schools through development and adoption of new learning standards, identification of aligned curriculum, and expanded opportunities for professional development for teachers. A significant emphasis has also been made on improving career and technical education programs focused on high-demand programs. Middle schools have successfully served one thousand four hundred full-time equivalent students in career and technical programs rich in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics through a grant program. The legislature concludes that opportunities for hands-on and applied learning in these programs should be extended to middle school students on an ongoing, statewide basis so that students are prepared to take advantage of more advanced coursework in high school and postsecondary education." [ 2009 c 212 s 1.]

Effective date—2007 c 396 s 14: "Section 14 of this act takes effect September 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 396 s 21.]

Expiration date—2007 c 396 s 13: "Section 13 of this act expires September 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 396 s 20.]

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.

Effective date—2006 c 263 s 407: "Section 407 of this act takes effect September 1, 2009." [ 2006 c 263 s 1002.]

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—1984 c 278: "Sections 16, 18, and 19 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1986." [ 1984 c 278 s 23.]

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.